Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1222.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-9204, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-9204. Public monies; prohibition Notwithstanding any other law, public monies may not be used to extend light rail service in Phoenix to: 1. The area with a boundary of seventeenth ninth avenue on the east, Adams Van Buren street on the north, eighteenth nineteenth avenue on the west and Jefferson Jackson street on the south. 2. Any area or property, including the streets described in paragraph 1 of this section, that is within fifty linear yards of the area described in paragraph 1 of this section. END_STATUTE